Washington statutes.
RCW 4.12.100

Transcript of record entries.

The clerk of the court must also transmit with the original papers where an order is made changing the place of trial, a certified transcript of all record entries up to and including the order for such change.

[Code 1881 s 58; 1877 p 13 s 59; RRS s 219.]